test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_1_tyo_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Por.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - työ - ok : # Noun 'arbeid' - n_1 - ok
     työ+N+Sg+Nom: työ
     työ+N+Sg+Gen: työn
     työ+N+Sg+Par: työtä
     työ+N+Sg+Tra: työksi
     työ+N+Sg+Abe: työttä
     työ+N+Sg+Ine: työssä
     työ+N+Sg+Ela: työstä
     työ+N+Sg+Ill: työhön
     työ+N+Sg+Ade: työlä
     työ+N+Sg+Abl: työltä
     työ+N+Sg+All: työle
     työ+N+Sg+Ess: työnä
     työ+N+Pl+Nom: työt
     työ+N+Pl+Gen: [töitten, töinen] #töinen vain Por. varieteetissä
     työ+N+Pl+Par: töitä
     työ+N+Pl+Tra: töiksi
     työ+N+Pl+Abe: töittä
     työ+N+Pl+Ine: töissä
     työ+N+Pl+Ela: töistä
     työ+N+Pl+Ill: töihin
     työ+N+Pl+Ade: töilä
     työ+N+Pl+Abl: töiltä
     työ+N+Pl+All: töile
     työ+N+Pl+Ess: töinä
     työ+N+Pl+Com: töine
